pt-PT: Tipo de alavanca: Alavancas excêntricas; Sem alavancas; Alavancas de desempenho; Alavancas padrão; Alavancas estilo Truitt; Outro
el: Τύπος μοχλού: Μοχλοί έκκεντρου; Χωρίς μοχλούς; Μοχλοί υψηλών επιδόσεων; Κανονικοί μοχλοί; Μοχλοί τύπου Truitt; Άλλο
de: Hebeltyp: Nockenhebel; Keine Hebel; Performance-Hebel; Standardhebel; Truitt-Hebel; Sonstige
ja: レバータイプ: カムレバー; レバーなし; パフォーマンスレバー; スタンダードレバー; トルイットスタイルレバー; その他
vi: Loại cần gạt: Đòn bẩy cam; Không có đòn bẩy; Đòn bẩy hiệu suất; Đòn bẩy tiêu chuẩn; Đòn bẩy kiểu Truitt; Khác
bg-BG: Тип лост: Ексцентрикови лостове; Без лостове; Лостове за високо натоварване; Стандартни лостове; Лостове тип Truitt; Други
ko: 레버 유형: 캠 레버; 레버 없음; 퍼포먼스 레버; 표준 레버; 트루이트 스타일 레버; 기타
sv: Spaktyp: Excenterspakar; Inga spakar; Prestandaspakar; Standardspakar; Spakar i Truitt-stil; Övrigt
pt-BR: Alavanca tipo: Alavancas de came; Sem alavancas; Alavancas de desempenho; Alavancas padrão; Alavancas estilo Truitt; Outro
cs: Typ páky: Vačkové páky; Bez pák; Výkonnostní páky; Standardní páky; Páky ve stylu Truitt; Jiné
nl: Hendel type: Nokkenhendels; Geen hendels; Prestatiehendels; Standaardhendels; Truitt-stijl hendels; Overig
fr: Type de levier: Leviers à came; Sans leviers; Leviers de performance; Leviers standard; Leviers de type Truitt; Autre
hr-HR: Vrsta poluge: Ekscentar poluge; Bez poluga; Napredne poluge; Standardne poluge; Poluge u Truitt stilu; Ostalo
it: Tipo di leva: Leve a camma; Senza leve; Leve performance; Leve standard; Leve in stile Truitt; Altro
nb: Type spak: Kamspaker; Ingen spaker; Ytelsesspaker; Standardspaker; Truitt-spaker; Annet
en: Lever type: Cam levers; No levers; Performance levers; Standard levers; Truitt-style levers; Other
zh-CN: 杠杆类型: 凸轮杠杆; 无杠杆; 性能杠杆; 标准杠杆; Truitt 风格杠杆; 其他
th: ประเภทคันโยก: คันโยกแบบลูกเบี้ยว; ไม่มีคันโยก; คันโยกประสิทธิภาพสูง; คันโยกมาตรฐาน; คันโยกสไตล์ Truitt; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Vrsta ročice: Odmične ročice; Brez ročic; Visokozmogljive ročice; Standardne ročice; Ročice v stilu Truitt; Drugo
lt-LT: Svirties tipas: Kumštelinės svirtys; Be svirčių; Sportinės svirtys; Standartinės svirtys; „Truitt“ stiliaus svirtys; Kita
es: Tipo de palanca: Palancas de leva; Sin palancas; Palancas de rendimiento; Palancas estándar; Palancas estilo Truitt; Otro
tr: Kol tipi: Kam kolları; Kol yok; Performans kolları; Standart kollar; Truitt tarzı kollar; Diğer
ro-RO: Tip de pârghie: Manete cu excentric; Fără manete; Manete de performanță; Manete standard; Manete stil Truitt; Altele
fi: Vivun tyyppi: Nokkavivut; Ei vipuja; Performance-vivut; Vakiovivut; Truitt-tyyliset vivut; Muu
hu: Kar típusa: Bütykös karok; Nincsenek karok; Teljesítménykarok; Standard karok; Truitt stílusú karok; Egyéb
sk-SK: Typ páky: Vačkové páčky; Bez páčok; Výkonnostné páčky; Štandardné páčky; Páčky v štýle Truitt; Iné
pl: Typ dźwigni: Dźwignie krzywkowe; Brak dźwigni; Dźwignie wyczynowe (performance); Dźwignie standardowe; Dźwignie typu Truitt; Inne
ru: Тип рычага: Кулачковые рычаги; Без рычагов; Усовершенствованные рычаги; Стандартные рычаги; Рычаги в стиле Truitt; Другое
da: Håndtagstype: Cam-håndtag; Ingen håndtag; Performance-håndtag; Standardhåndtag; Truitt-style håndtag; Andet
zh-TW: 變調桿類型: 凸輪槓桿; 無槓桿; 效能槓桿; 標準槓桿; Truitt 式槓桿; 其他